Arkansas, session 2025, HB1986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-238. Excused absences — Children of fallen service members and
children of fallen first responders — Definitions.
(a) A student who meets one (1) of the following qualifications shall
not be considered absent from his or her public school for the time during
which he or she is absent from school due to a mental health concern or to
attend an event from a sponsoring organization that provides support to
families of fallen service members or first responders or provides support
for traumatic loss, grief, or resiliency:
(1) A student who is a child of a fallen service member; or
(2) A student who is a child of a fallen first responder.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Child" means a biological or adopted son, daughter,
stepson, or stepdaughter;
(2) "First responder" means a firefighter, law enforcement
*TNL420*
04/03/2025 12:35:57 PM TNL420

HB1986
officer, or person employed as an emergency medical provider; and
(3) "Public school" means:
(A) A public school within a public school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school.
(c)(1) In order for a student to receive an excused absence under this
section, the student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco
parentis to the student shall provide written documentation that the
student's absence is to attend an event from a sponsoring organization that
provides support to families of fallen service members or first responders or
provides support for traumatic loss, grief, or resiliency.
(2) A public school may utilize the Resources Page for Military
Family Engagement on the Department of Education website to verify an
organization that provides support to the military and first responder
community.
(d) A student who receives an excused absence under this section
shall:
(1) Be in good academic standing;
(2) Have a prior record of good attendance at his or her school;
and
(3) Complete and turn in any missed classwork within the time
period required by the school in which the student is enrolled.
(e) A student shall not be granted an excused absence under this
section if the absence occurs during a date on which standardized testing is
administered.












04/03/2025 12:35:57 PM TNL420